Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 1. Offenses Related to Alcohol, Inhalants, and Controlled Substances; Implied Consent.
Sec. 28.35.037.
Remission of forfeitures.

Upon receiving notice from the court of the time and place set for a hearing under AS

28.35.036

, the state shall provide to every person who has an ascertainable ownership or security interest in the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft written notice that includes

a description of the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft;

the time and place of the forfeiture hearing;

the legal authority under which the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft, may be forfeited;

notice of the right to intervene to protect the interest in the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft.

At the hearing, a person who claims an ownership or security interest in the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft, must establish by a preponderance of the evidence that

the petitioner has an interest in the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft, acquired in good faith;

a person other than the petitioner was convicted of the offense that resulted in the forfeiture; and

before parting with the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft, the petitioner did not know or have reasonable cause to believe that it would be used in the commission of an offense.

If a person satisfies the requirements of (b) of this section, the court shall order that an amount equal to the value of the petitioner’s interest in the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft be paid to the petitioner, or the court shall order that the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft be released to the petitioner together with title to the motor vehicle, aircraft or watercraft.

Forfeiture of a motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft under AS

28.35.036

is without prejudice to the rights and does not extinguish the claims of a creditor with an interest in the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft.

History.

(§ 23 ch 77 SLA 1983; am § 31 ch 119 SLA 1990; am § 49 ch 60 SLA 2002)

Sec. 28.35.038.
Municipal impoundment and forfeiture. [Repealed, § 55 ch 60 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 28.35.039.
Definitions for AS 28.35.029 — 28.35.039.

In AS

28.35.029

—

28.35.039

,

“alcohol safety action program” means a program for alcohol and substance abuse screening, referral, and monitoring developed and implemented or approved by the Department of Health and Social Services under AS 47.37;

“controlled substance” has the meaning given in AS

28.33.190

.

History.

(§ 15 ch 55 SLA 1994; am § 12 ch 143 SLA 1996; am § 50 ch 60 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (1) was enacted as (2); renumbered in 1996, at which time former (1) was renumbered as (2).

Sec. 28.35.040.
[Renumbered as AS 28.35.400.]

Sec. 28.35.045.
[Renumbered as AS 28.35.410.]